District of Columbia statutes.
6-102.02

Housing projects; powers of Authority.

In addition to its other powers, the Authority shall have the power to acquire sites for and to prepare, carry out, acquire, lease, and operate housing projects, as defined in § 6-102.01, and to construct or provide for the construction, reconstruction, improvement, alteration, or repair of any such housing project, or any part thereof, in the District of Columbia.

June 12, 1934, ch. 465, title II, § 202
June 25, 1938, 52 Stat. 1188, ch. 691, § 5

Report on collections of rent: H.R. 3067, amended by H.R. 99-419, incorporated in Pub. L. 99-190 by § 101(c), the D.C. Appropriation Act, 1986, provided that the Director of the Department of Housing and Community Development shall report every 6 months to the Council of the District of Columbia on collections of rent from public housing stock.

Establishment of District of Columbia Public Housing Advisory Board: See Mayor’s Order 89-202, September 8, 1989.

1973 Ed., § 5-113.
1981 Ed., § 5-112.